Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-117 Penalties.

(a) (1) Any person subject to this article in the
capacity of the operator, owner, or registrant of a motor vehicle operated in
this State, or registered in this State, who violates any applicable provision
of this article, shall be subject to citation for the violation by any county
police department in a form and manner approved by the traffic violations
bureau of the district court of the first circuit;

(2) Notwithstanding any provision of the Hawaii Penal
Code:

(A) Each violation shall be deemed a separate
offense and shall be subject to a fine of not less than $100 nor more than
$5,000 which shall not be suspended except as provided in subparagraph (B); and

(B) If the person is convicted of not having
had a motor vehicle insurance policy in effect at the time the citation was
issued, the fine shall be $500 for the first offense and a minimum of $1,500
for each subsequent offense that occurs within a five-year period from any
prior offense; provided that the judge:

(i) Shall have the discretion to suspend all or
any portion of the fine if the defendant provides proof of having a current
motor vehicle insurance policy; provided further that upon the defendant's
request, the judge may grant community service in lieu of the fine, of not less
than seventy-five hours and not more than one hundred hours for the first
offense, and not less than two hundred hours nor more than two hundred
seventy-five hours for the second offense; and

(ii) May grant community service in lieu of the
fine for subsequent offenses at the judge's discretion;

(3) In addition to the fine in paragraph (2), the
court shall either:

(A) Suspend the driver's license of the driver
or of the registered owner for:

(i) Three months for the first conviction; and

(ii) One year for any subsequent offense within
a five-year period from a previous offense;

provided that the driver or the
registered owner shall not be required to obtain proof of financial
responsibility pursuant to section 287-20; or

(B) Require the driver or the registered owner
to keep a nonrefundable motor vehicle insurance policy in force for six months;

(4) Any person cited under this section shall have an
opportunity to present a good faith defense, including but not limited to lack
of knowledge or proof of insurance. The general penalty provision of this
section shall not apply to:

(A) Any operator of a motor vehicle owned by
another person if the operator's own insurance covers such driving;

(B) Any operator of a motor vehicle owned by
that person's employer during the normal scope of that person's employment; or

(C) Any operator of a borrowed motor vehicle
if the operator holds a reasonable belief that the subject vehicle is insured;

(5) In the case of multiple convictions for driving
without a valid motor vehicle insurance policy within a five-year period from
any prior offense, the court, in addition to any other penalty, shall impose
the following penalties:

(A) Imprisonment of not more than thirty days;

(B) Suspension or revocation of the motor
vehicle registration plates of the vehicle involved;

(C) Impoundment, or impoundment and sale, of
the motor vehicle for the costs of storage and other charges incident to
seizure of the vehicle, or any other cost involved pursuant to section
431:10C-301; or

(D) Any combination of those penalties; and

(6) Any violation as provided in subsection (a)(2)(B)
shall not be deemed to be a traffic infraction as defined by chapter 291D.

(b) Any person, in the capacity of a licensed
or unlicensed motor vehicle insurer, self-insurer, producer, or other
representative, who violates any provision of this article shall be assessed a
civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each violation.

(c) Any person, in the capacity of a licensed
or unlicensed motor vehicle insurer, self-insurer, producer, or other
representative, who knowingly violates any provision of this article shall be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than $3,000 and not to exceed $10,000 for
each violation.

(d) (1) Violations of subsections (b) and (c) shall
be subject to the construction that each repetition of such act shall
constitute a separate violation; and

(2) The imposition of any civil penalty under
subsection (a), (b), or (c) shall be in addition to, and shall not in any way
limit or affect the application of, any other civil or criminal penalty, or
public safety condition or requirement, provided by law. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2; am L 1988, c 345, §1; am L 1989, c 348, §1; am L 1990, c 167, §1; am L
1993, c 205, §25; am L Sp 1993, c 4, §4; am L 1996, c 20, §1; ree L 1997, c 2,
§11 and am c 251, §27; am L 1998, c 231, §2 and c 275, §9; am L 2002, c 155,
§69; am L 2006, c 195, §1]

Case Notes

Applies to repeat offenders and to defendants being sentenced
at a single proceeding. 751 F. Supp. 1420.

Borrower of a vehicle cannot assert a good-faith defense
without at least inquiring of the owner whether or not the vehicle is insured.
71 H. 178, 787 P.2d 214.

Where State conceded that appellant had borrowed uninsured
vehicle from a friend, in order to defeat lack of knowledge defense, State was
required to prove beyond reasonable doubt that appellant actually knew that the
vehicle was uninsured at the time appellant was operating it. 78 H. 86, 890
P.2d 673.

As §571-1 mandates against treating juvenile adjudications as
convictions, appellate court erred in holding that defendant's prior juvenile
adjudication of driving without no-fault insurance constituted a conviction for
purposes of applying the repeat offender sentencing provisions of this section
(1993) to defendant's subsequent offense of driving without no-fault
insurance. 92 H. 521, 993 P.2d 555.

Section mandates that an insurer be fined if it violates
§431:10C-207 but gives the commissioner some discretion as to the amount of the
fine; commissioner's imposition of $3,000 fine was not an abuse of discretion
as it satisfied the statutory requirements. 104 H. 261, 88 P.3d 196.

Certified copy of a person's traffic abstract is satisfactory
evidence to establish the person's prior no no-fault insurance conviction;
State not required to show defendant was counseled at time of prior no no-fault
insurance conviction; there was insufficient proof of defendant's prior
conviction to support enhanced sentence for no no-fault insurance offense,
where record disclosed no evidence to tie defendant with [person with the same
name] of the traffic abstract. 9 H. App. 516, 852 P.2d 476.

Pursuant to §431:10C-117(a)(2) (1992) good faith defense and
§431:10C-117(a)(2)(C) (1992) reasonable belief defense, borrower of a motor
vehicle has a statutory right to reasonably believe that borrowed motor vehicle
is insured. If one or more relevant facts reasonably required borrower to
inquire, borrower then had a duty to inquire until borrower reasonably believed
that motor vehicle was insured. 10 H. App. 519, 879 P.2d 566.

It was the "obvious intention" of the legislature
to authorize the retroactive application of the part of Act 167, L 1990, that
authorized the sentencing court the discretion to impose a sentence of
community service instead of a fine. 77 H. 476 (App.), 888 P.2d 376.

Where defendant was sentenced pursuant to subsection (a)(2),
because the district court may have been unaware of the applicability of quoted
parts of §§706-641 and 706-642 and of its discretionary authority to sentence
defendant to perform community service rather than to pay the fine, appellate
court vacated the part of the sentence ordering defendant to pay a $1,000 fine
and remanded that part for resentencing. 77 H. 476 (App.), 888 P.2d 376.

An officer who has grounds to arrest individual for driving
without no-fault insurance is required to issue summons or citation in lieu of
physically taking defendant to police station or court. 78 H. 98 (App.), 890
P.2d 685.

When trial court revoked driver's suspended sentence, it
lacked authority to do so where the State, despite knowledge that driver had
been arrested for another no-motor-vehicle-insurance charge, did not move to
revoke driver's suspended sentence within the suspended sentence period, and
driver was not convicted of the second citation charge until after the
suspended sentence period for the first citation had already expired. 106 H.
391 (App.), 105 P.3d 1197.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next